Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-710
State wayside areas; powers and duties of department; rules and regulations; contracts authorized.

The Department of Transportation shall establish, operate, and maintain state wayside areas. Pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, the department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to govern the use of state wayside areas and may establish fees for services, including overnight camping.

The department may contract with public or private entities for the operation and maintenance of state wayside areas.

If the department determines that an area is no longer suited or needed as a state wayside area, the department may close such area or any part thereof and declare such area or facilities as surplus. The department shall offer to convey the surplus land or facilities to all local political subdivisions in the vicinity, and if such offers are rejected, the department may sell such lands and facilities.

Laws 1983, LB 610, § 7;

Laws 2014, LB757, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 281.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.